Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-711
Lender or claimant; duty to notify museum; when.

(1) The lender or claimant of property on loan to a museum shall notify the museum of a change of address or change in ownership of the property. Failure to notify the museum of these changes may result in the lender's or claimant's loss of rights in the property.

(2) The lender or claimant of property on loan to a museum may file with the museum a notice of intent to preserve an interest in the property as provided for in section 51-706. The filing of a notice of intent to preserve an interest in property on loan to a museum does not validate or make enforceable any claim which would be extinguished under the terms of a written agreement or which would otherwise be invalid or unenforceable.

Laws 1996, LB 1276, § 11.